North Carolina, session 2025, HB714.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a mechanism for the
State to provide a universal healthcare benefit plan for the residents of the State. To that end, the
Commissioner of Insurance shall develop and make progress toward establishing and
implementing a universal healthcare benefit plan whereby residents pay premiums on a sliding
scale that aims to ensure affordability of the universal healthcare benefit plan based upon
household income level. Coverage will be available to residents with incomes that exceed those
that would otherwise qualify them for coverage under the Medicaid program. No later than
January 1, 2026, the Commissioner shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services detailing the plans for implementation of the coverage
required by this act.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 58-2-40(2) is recodified as G.S. 58-2-40(b).
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 58-2-40, as amended by subsection (a) of this section, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 58-2-40. Powers and duties of Commissioner.
(a) The Commissioner shall:has the duty to do all of the following:
(1) See that all laws of this State that the Commissioner is responsible for
administering and the provisions of this Chapter are faithfully executed; and
to executed. To that end end, the Commissioner is authorized to adopt rules
rules, in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, in order to
enforce, carry out and make effective the provisions of those laws. The
Commissioner is also authorized to adopt such further rules not contrary to
those laws that will prevent persons subject to the Commissioner's regulatory
authority from engaging in practices injurious to the public.
…
(b) Have The Commissioner shall have the power and authority to adopt rules pertaining
to and governing the solicitation of proxies, including related financial reporting in connection
therewith, reporting requirements, with respect to the capital stock or other equity securities of
any domestic stock insurance company.
*H714-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The Commissioner shall establish a State-government run, universal healthcare
benefit plan. The Commissioner is authorized to do all of the following:
(1) Create any advisory board or committee for providing recommendations on
the creation, implementation, or operation of the universal healthcare benefit
plan.
(2) Set and collect premiums for the coverage in a manner that seeks to ensure
affordability and takes into account the household income level of the covered
persons.
(3) Design the benefit coverage available under the universal healthcare benefit
plan. This coverage shall meet or exceed all federal requirements for
individual health benefit plans under the Affordable Care Act."
SECTION 3. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Insurance the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to plan for and begin the implementation of the
universal healthcare benefit plan required by this act.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 714-First Edition